src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BUFFALO !!= * __@CODE@__ consonant fin loanwords, some vow fin like revya
           +N+Sg+Nom:                                       K                   ;
    +N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG:a                                      K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/SgNom:a%>                                    R                   ;
        +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                                     R                   ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:a                                      K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:                                       K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/SgGen:a%>                                    R                   ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:a                                      K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j                                   K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s                                   K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn                                  K                   ;
              +N+Ess:a%>n                                   K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t                                   K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd                                  K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/PlGen:a%>jd                                  R                   ;
           +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd                                  K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde                                 K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn                                  K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn                               K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%-                                 ENDLEX              ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
           +N+Sg+Nom:a%>                                    NPx12Vvowch         ;
              < "+N":0 "+Sg":a "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx3Vvowch          ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:a%>                                    NPxVvowch           ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:a%>                                    NPxVvowch           ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa%>                                NPxA                ;
           +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st%>                                NPxC                ;
           +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn%>                                NPxC                ;
              +N+Ess:a%>n%>                                 NPxC                ;
!          +N+Pl+Nom:a%>jd%>                                NPx1C               ;
           +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd%>                                NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd%>                                NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%>                              NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn%>                                NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd%>                                NPxPlComC           ;
  +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jn%>                                NPxPlComC           ;
                  +N:a%>                                    DenominalNounsV     ;
                  +N:a%>                                    DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!                 +N:a%>                                    DenominalAdjsV2     ; !not very plausible
 
LEXICON ESSAYA !!= * __@CODE@__ recent loanwords on vow+a
           +N+Sg+Nom:a                                                   K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/SgNom:a%>                                                 R                   ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:a                                                   K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/SgGen:a%>                                                 R                   ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:a                                                   K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:i%>j                                                K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:a%>j                                                K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Loc:a%>s                                                K                   ;
           +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn                                               K                   ;
              +N+Ess:a%>n                                                K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Nom:a%>t                                                K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd                                               K                   ;
        +N+Cmp/PlGen:a%>jd                                               R                   ;
           +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd                                               K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jde                                              K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn                                               K                   ;
           +N+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn                                            K                   ;
        +N+Pl+Com/Sh:a%>j%-                                              ENDLEX              ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
              < "+N":0 "+Sg":a "+Nom":%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" >              NPx3A               ;
           +N+Sg+Nom:a%>                                                 NPx12A              ;
           +N+Sg+Gen:a%>                                                 NPxA                ;
           +N+Sg+Acc:a%>                                                 NPxA                ;
           +N+Sg+Ill:a%>sa%>                                             NPxA                ;
           +N+Sg+Loc:a%>st%>                                             NPxC                ;
           +N+Sg+Com:a%>jn%>                                             NPxC                ;
              +N+Ess:a%>n%>                                              NPxC                ;
              < "+N":0 "+Pl":a "+Nom":%> 0:j 0:d 0:%> "@R.Nom3Px.add@" > NPx1C               ;
           +N+Pl+Gen:a%>jd%>                                             NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Acc:a%>jd%>                                             NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Ill:a%>jdas%>                                           NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Loc:a%>jn%>                                             NPxC                ;
           +N+Pl+Com:a%>jd%>                                             NPxPlComC           ;
  +N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:a%>jn%>                                             NPxPlComC           ;
                  +N:a%>                                                 DenominalNounsV     ;
                  +N:a%>                                                 DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
!                 +N:a%>                                                 DenominalAdjsV2     ; !not very plausible
