src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
Samvirke-kafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc+CmpN/First:Samvirke-kafe ESSAYA ;
Savio-musea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build+CmpN/First:Savio-muse ESSAYA ;
Siida-musea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build+CmpN/First:Siida-muse ESSAYA ;
Siida-sámemusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build+CmpN/First:Siida-sáme#muse ESSAYA ;
TV-show+Event+CmpN/First:TV-show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
cd-rom+CmpN/First:cd9-rom9 BUFFALO ;
tv-show+Event+CmpN/First:tv-show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
tv-šovva+Event+CmpN/First:tv-šovva BUFFALO ;
v-cup+Event+CmpN/First:v-cup9 BUFFALO ;
LEXICON Noun
IT-kafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:IT-kafe ESSAYA ;
aids:aids BUFFALO ;
airbag:air#bag9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
allea:alle ESSAYA ;
apartheid:apart^heid9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
armea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/PlG+Org:arme ESSAYA ;
backflip:back^flip9 BUFFALO ;
bajásšaddankomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:bajás#šaddan#komite ESSAYA ;
bealdodrag:bealdo#drag9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
beallemaraton:bealle#maraton BUFFALO ;
beanavuodjenkaféa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:beana#vuodjen#kafé ESSAYA ;
bearašmusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:bearaš#muse ESSAYA ;
bearráigeahččankomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:bearrái#geahččan#komite ESSAYA ;
punkpop:punk9#pop9 BUFFALO ;
sámekafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:sáme#kafe ESSAYA ;
blues:blue9s BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
boazodoallokomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:boazo#doallo#komite ESSAYA ;
boradankafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:boradan#kafe ESSAYA ;
byrå+Org+Use/Sub:byrå BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
guollefilea:guolle#file ESSAYA ;
kulturkomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:kultur#komite ESSAYA ;
kulttorkomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:kulttor#komite ESSAYA ;
chat:chat9 BUFFALO ;
comeback:come#back9 BUFFALO ;
cup+Event:cup9 BUFFALO ;
demeansakafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:demeansa#kafe ESSAYA ;
design:design BUFFALO ;
idjakafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc+Event:idja#kafe ESSAYA ;
nominašunkomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:nominašun#komite ESSAYA ;
nominašuvdnakomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:nominašuvdna#komite ESSAYA ;
dutkankafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:dutkan#kafe ESSAYA ;
nuoraidrevy:nuoraid9#revy BUFFALO ;
dáiddamusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:dáidda#muse ESSAYA ;
eananvuovdinkomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:eanan#vuovdin#komité ESSAYA ;
evaŋgelium+Use/Sub:evaŋgeli^um9 BUFFALO ;
festiválakro:festivála#kro BUFFALO ;
filbmaidea:filbma#ide ESSAYA ;
gákteshow+Event:gákte#show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
fuolahuskomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:fuolahus#komite ESSAYA ;
fylkkarevy:fylkka#revy BUFFALO ;
vuoitotrofea:vuoito#trofe ESSAYA ;
nuoladanshow+Event:nuoladan#show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
geassekafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:geasse#kafe ESSAYA ;
gielladikšunkafea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:giella#dikšun#kafe ESSAYA ;
gilimusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:gili#muse ESSAYA ;
glykogena+Use/Sub:glykogen BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
gollemusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:golle#muse ESSAYA ;
guovllukomitea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:guovllu#komite ESSAYA ;
hardrock:hard^rock BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
hip-hop+CmpN/None:hip9-hop9 BUFFALO ;
idéa:idé ESSAYA ;
isláma+Use/Sub:islam9 BUFFALO ;
justiisakomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:justiisa#komité ESSAYA ;
kabarea+Use/Sub:cabare BUFFALO ;
kabaréa:kabaré ESSAYA ;
keyboard:key^board9 BUFFALO ;
kirkolaškomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:kirkolaš#komité ESSAYA ;
klišéa:klišé ESSAYA ;
kommunikéa:kommuniké ESSAYA ;
kro:kro BUFFALO ;
kupea+Use/Sub:kupé BUFFALO ;
loahppakommunikéa:loahppa#kommuniké ESSAYA ;
marathon:marathon9 BUFFALO ;
militearaattašéa:militeara#attašé ESSAYA ; !^LOAN
mohawk:mohawk BUFFALO ;
muohtaskohtercross+Event+Use/Sub:muohta#scooter#cross9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
musea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:muse ESSAYA ;
muslim+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:muslim9 BUFFALO ;
illušunshow+Event:illušun#show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
nationálamusea+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:nationála#muse ESSAYA ;
nállevealahankomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:nálle#vealahan#komité ESSAYA ;
oađđenkupea+Use/Sub:oađđen#kupe BUFFALO ;
oađđenkupea+Use/Sub:oađđin#kupé BUFFALO ;
oađđenkupéa:oađđin#kupé ESSAYA ;
olmmošvuoigatvuođakomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:olmmoš#vuoigatvuođa#komité ESSAYA ;
ođđajagecross+Event:ođđa#jage#cross9 BUFFALO ;
pickup:pick^up9 BUFFALO ;
punk:punk BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
riddoduottarmuséa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:riddo#duottar#musé ESSAYA ;
sámerock:sáme#rock BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
popjazz:pop9#jazz9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
shuar:shu^ar BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
skohtercrossa+Use/Sub:scooter#cross9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
skuhtercross+Event:skuhter#cross9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
skuterdrag:skuter#drag9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
sound:sound9 BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
supercross+Event:super#cross9 BUFFALO ;
rievvárheat:rievvár#heat BUFFALO ;
sámemuséa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Hum:sáme#musé ESSAYA ;
trinitrotoluen:trinitrotolu^en BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
troféa:trofé ESSAYA ;
turnéa:turné ESSAYA ;
universitehtamuséa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org+Build:universitehta#musé ESSAYA ;
moteshow+Event:mote#show BUFFALO ; !^LOAN
čáhcedrag:čáhce#drag9 BUFFALO ;
ministerkomitéa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Org:minister#komité ESSAYA ;
lávvardatkaféa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Plc:lávvardat#kafé ESSAYA ;
